District of Columbia statutes.
11-708

Clerks and secretaries for judges.

Each judge may appoint and remove a personal secretary. The chief judge may appoint and remove three personal law clerks, and each associate judge may appoint and remove two personal law clerks. In addition, the chief judge may appoint and remove not more than three law clerks for the court. The law clerks appointed for the court shall serve as directed by the chief judge.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 480, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Dec. 31, 1975, 89 Stat. 1098, Pub. L. 94-191, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-708.
1973 Ed., § 11-708.